Maryland, session 2025, HB1325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
9.5–118.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1325*

HOUSE BILL 1325
(2) “CHILD CARE FACILITY” MEANS:
(I) A LICENSED CHILD CARE CENTER;
(II) A REGISTERED FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME; OR
(III) A REGISTERED LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME.
(3) “CHILD CARE PROVIDER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES
CARE FOR A CHILD IN A CHILD CARE FACILITY.
(4) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE SUBSTITUTE CHILD CARE PROVIDER
POOL PILOT PROGRAM.
(5) “SUBSTITUTE CHILD CARE PROVIDER POOL” MEANS ONE OR
MORE CHILD CARE PROVIDERS WHO ARE AVAILABLE TO PROVIDE TEMPORARY CARE
TO CHILDREN AS A SUBSTITUTE FOR A REGULAR CHILD CARE PROVIDER IN A CHILD
CARE FACILITY AND WHO:
(I) HAVE THE REQUIRED CREDENTIALS, TRAINING,
EXPERIENCE, AND CRIMINAL HISTORY VETTING TO WORK IN A CHILD CARE
FACILITY; AND
(II) ARE LOCATED IN THE SAME REGION OF THE STATE AS THE
CHILD CARE FACILITY PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM.
(B) (1) THERE IS A SUBSTITUTE CHILD CARE PROVIDER POOL PILOT
PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO FACILITATE THE
CONTINUOUS OPERATION OF CHILD CARE FACILITIES IN THE STATE BY ENSURING
THAT QUALIFIED SUBSTITUTE CHILD CARE PROVIDERS ARE AVAILABLE TO FILL
SHORT–TERM STAFFING NEEDS OF CHILD CARE FACILITIES ON A TEMPORARY BASIS.
(3) THE PROGRAM SHALL BEGIN JULY 1, 2026, AND END JUNE 30,
2030 2028.
(C) (1) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SELECT A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION TO ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2030 AND
2028, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AWARD A GRANT OF $350,000 $50,000 TO THE
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION SELECTED TO ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 1325 3
(2) TO BE ELIGIBLE TO ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM AND RECEIVE A
GRANT UNDER THIS SECTION, A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION SHALL:
(I) BE A PUBLIC BENEFIT CORPORATION THAT IS EXEMPT
FROM TAXATION AS PROVIDED BY LAW;
(II) OPERATE THROUGHOUT THE STATE;
(III) HAVE EXPERIENCE WORKING WITH CHILD CARE FACILITIES
OF ALL TYPES; AND
(IV) HAVE EXPERIENCE HELPING INDIVIDUALS MEET THE
LEGAL REQUIREMENTS TO WORK AS CHILD CARE PROVIDERS.
(D) THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION SELECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL USE THE GRANT TO:
(1) ORGANIZE A SUBSTITUTE CHILD CARE PROVIDER POOLS POOL IN
AT LEAST THREE REGIONS ONE REGION IN THE STATE, INCLUDING A RURAL,
SUBURBAN, AND URBAN AREA;
(2) RECRUIT CREDENTIALED CHILD CARE PROVIDERS TO PROVIDE
SUBSTITUTE CHILD CARE SERVICES IN MULTIPLE CHILD CARE FACILITIES
PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM;
(3) ASSIST A SUBSTITUTE CHILD CARE PROVIDER WITH MEETING THE
REQUIREMENTS TO WORK IN A CHILD CARE FACILITY, INCLUDING BY HELPING THE
SUBSTITUTE CHILD CARE PROVIDER:
(I) OBTAIN A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK, AS
REQUIRED UNDER § 5–551 OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE, AS AN EMPLOYEE, A
CONTRACTOR, OR A SUBCONTRACTOR OF THE CHILD CARE FACILITY;
(II) MEET ANY EXPERIENTIAL OR EDUCATIONAL
REQUIREMENTS; AND
(III) COMPLETE ANY REQUIRED TRAINING, INCLUDING HEALTH
AND SAFETY TRAINING AND FIRST AID TRAINING;
(4) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, ASSIST A SUBSTITUTE CHILD CARE
PROVIDER IN COMPLETING A REGISTERED EARLY EDUCATION APPRENTICESHIP;

HOUSE BILL 1325
(5) IDENTIFY AND ORGANIZE, INTO REGIONAL AREAS, CHILD CARE
FACILITIES THAT AGREE TO WORK WITH SUBSTITUTE CHILD CARE PROVIDERS FROM
A POOL ESTABLISHED BY THE PROGRAM;
(6) KEEP ANY RECORDS REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(7) COMPLY WITH ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(E) THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION SELECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT MAY
USE THE GRANT TO:
(1) CREATE A STATEWIDE DIGITAL PLATFORM TO FACILITATE THE
MATCHING OF SUBSTITUTE CHILD CARE PROVIDERS FROM THE SUBSTITUTE CHILD
CARE PROVIDER POOL WITH PARTICIPATING CHILD CARE FACILITIES, INCLUDING
PARTNERING WITH A THIRD–PARTY VENDOR; AND
(2) INCENTIVIZE PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM BY QUALIFIED
CHILD CARE PROVIDERS AND CHILD CARE FACILITIES.
(F) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2030 AND 2028, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
$375,000 $50,000 FOR THE PROGRAM.
(G) EACH YEAR THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH GOALS
FOR THE PROGRAM.
(H) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2029 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE STATUS OF THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING:
(1) AN EVALUATION OF THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) WHETHER THE PROGRAM HAS MET THE GOALS SET BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2030
2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated
and of no further force and effect.